Utah statutes.
26-10-4.   State plan for maternal and child health services.
The department shall prepare and submit a state plan for maternal and child
health services as required by Title II of the Public Health Services Act. The
plan shall be the official state plan for the state and shall be used as the
basis for administration of Title V programs within the state.
